South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S87.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-3-20(19) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (19) establish methods of auditing election results, which may include risk-limiting audits, hand-count audits, results verification through independent third-party vendors that specialize in election auditing, ballot reconciliation, or any other method deemed appropriate by the executive director.  Election result audits must be conducted in all statewide elections after the election concludes, but prior to certification by the State Board of Canvassers, and may be performed following any other election held in the State at the discretion of the executive director. A hand-count audit must be conducted publicly. Once completed, audit reports must be published on the commission's website. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----